Louisiana, session 2026, SB474.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 54 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:3111.1 through 3111.9, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 54. INFRASTRUCTURE AND ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE RISK
§3111.1. Short Title
This Chapter may be cited as "Protecting Louisiana's Infrastructure
from Artificial Intelligence Risk Act".
Page 1 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-731 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 474
§3111.2. Definitions
A. As used in this Chapter, the following words shall mean the following:
(1) "Affiliate" means a person controlling, controlled by, or under
common control with a specified person.
(2) "Artificial intelligence model" means a machine-based system that
receives inputs and generates outputs, including but not limited to predictions,
content, recommendations, or decisions that can influence physical or virtual
environments. "Artificial intelligence model" includes machine learning models,
deep learning models, and other computational models designed to simulate
aspects of human intelligence.
(3)(a) "Catastrophic risk" means a foreseeable and material risk that a
frontier developer's development, storage, use, or deployment of a frontier
model will materially contribute to the death or serious injury of more than fifty
people or more than one billion dollars in property damage or loss arising from
a single incident involving a frontier model:
(i) Providing expert-level assistance in the creation, synthesis,
acquisition, weaponization, or release of a chemical or biological weapon,
including but not limited to the identification of novel chemical compounds or
biological agents with potential for weaponization, or the provision of detailed
technical instructions for the production, stabilization, or dispersal of such
agents.
(ii) Engaging in or materially facilitating a cyberattack, with no
meaningful human oversight, intervention, or supervision, against critical
infrastructure systems, including but not limited to energy production and
distribution systems, healthcare information technology systems, port logistics
and navigation systems, water treatment facilities, or electrical grid systems,
where cyberattacks result in or poses a substantial risk of physical harm,
environmental damage, or significant disruption of essential services.
(iii) Engaging in conduct with no meaningful human oversight,
Page 2 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-731 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 474
intervention, or supervision that, if the conduct had been committed by a
human, would constitute a felony under state or federal law, including but not
limited to offenses involving extortion, fraud, theft, or unauthorized access to
computer systems.
(iv) Evading the control of its frontier developer or user in a manner that
demonstrates autonomous pursuit of objectives inconsistent with the developer's
or user's instructions or safety protocols.
(b) "Catastrophic risk" does not include a foreseeable and material risk
from any of the following:
(i) Information that a frontier model outputs if the information is
otherwise publicly accessible in a substantially similar form from a source other
than a foundation model.
(ii) Lawful activity of the state or federal government.
(iii) Harm caused by a frontier model in combination with other software
if the frontier model did not materially contribute to the harm.
(4) "Critical infrastructure" means systems, assets, and networks,
whether physical or virtual, that are so vital to the state or the United States,
that the incapacity or destruction of these systems, assets, or networks, would
have a debilitating impact on public health, public safety, economic security, or
any combination thereof. "Critical infrastructure" includes, without limitation,
energy production and refining facilities, healthcare delivery systems, shipping
port operations and logistics systems, water treatment and distribution systems,
electrical generation and transmission systems, natural gas pipeline systems,
and petrochemical manufacturing facilities.
(5) "Critical safety incident" means any of the following:
(a) Unauthorized access to, modification of, or exfiltration of the model
weights of a frontier model that results in death, bodily injury, or a cyberattack
against critical infrastructure.
(b) Harm resulting from the materialization of a catastrophic risk as
Page 3 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-731 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 474
defined in this Section.
(c) Loss of control of a frontier model causing death, bodily injury, or
damage to critical infrastructure.
(d) A frontier model that provides specific and actionable technical
assistance for the creation of a chemical or biological weapon to a person who
would not otherwise have been able to obtain that assistance.
(e) A frontier model that uses deceptive techniques against the frontier
developer to subvert the controls or monitoring of its frontier developer outside
of the context of an evaluation designed to elicit this behavior and in a manner
that demonstrates materially increased catastrophic risk.
(6) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Justice, office of
the attorney general.
(7) "Deploy" means to make a frontier model available to a third party,
except for the primary purpose of developing or evaluating the frontier model.
(8) "Foundation model" means an artificial intelligence model that is
trained on a broad data set, designed for generality of output, and adaptable to
a wide range of distinctive tasks.
(9) "Frontier AI framework" means documented technical and
organizational protocols to manage, assess, and mitigate catastrophic risks, with
specific provisions for assessing risks related to cybersecurity threats to critical
infrastructure and biochemical weapon development.
(10) "Frontier developer" means a person who has trained, or initiated
the training of, a frontier model, with respect to which the person has used, or
intends to use, at least as much computing power to train the frontier model.
(11)(a) "Frontier model" means a foundation model that either:
(i) Was trained using a quantity of computing power greater than 10^26
integer or floating-point operations; or
(ii) Was produced by applying knowledge distillation to a frontier model
as defined in this Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph, provided that the
Page 4 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-731 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 474
compute cost for applying knowledge distillation exceeds five million dollars.
(b) The quantity of computing power described in Subparagraph (a) of
this Paragraph includes computing for the original training run and any
subsequent fine-tuning, reinforcement learning, or other material modifications
to a preceding foundation model.
(12) "Knowledge distillation" means any supervised learning technique
using a larger artificial intelligence model or its output to train a smaller model
with similar or equivalent capabilities.
(13) "Large frontier developer" means a frontier developer that together
with its affiliates had more than five hundred million dollars in annual gross
revenues in the preceding calendar year.
(14) "Model weight" means a numerical parameter in a frontier model
that is adjusted through training and helps determine how inputs are
transformed into outputs.
(15) "Property" means corporeal or incorporeal property.
§3111.3. Frontier AI framework requirements
A. A large frontier developer shall write, implement, comply with, and
clearly and conspicuously publish on its internet website a frontier AI
framework that applies to the large frontier developer's frontier models and
describes in detail how the large frontier developer approaches all of the
following:
(1) Incorporating national and international standards, and
industry-consensus best practices into its frontier AI framework, including
standards related to cybersecurity and biosecurity risk management.
(2) Defining and assessing the large frontier developer's thresholds to
identify and assess whether a frontier model has capabilities that may pose a
catastrophic risk, including specific thresholds for cybersecurity capabilities
that may be used to compromise critical infrastructure and capabilities, and
that may assist in the development, production, or deployment of chemical or
Page 5 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-731 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 474
biological weapons. These thresholds may include multiple-tiered levels of
concern.
(3) Applying mitigations to address potential catastrophic risks identified
under Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, with specific mitigation strategies for
cybersecurity risks to critical infrastructure and biochemical weapon risks.
(4) Reviewing assessments and adequacy of mitigations as part of the
decision to deploy a frontier model or use it extensively and internally.
(5) Using third parties, including cybersecurity experts and biosecurity
specialists, to assess catastrophic risks and mitigation effectiveness.
(6) Revisiting and updating the frontier AI framework, including any
criteria that trigger updates and how the large frontier developer determines
when its frontier models are substantially modified enough to require
disclosures pursuant to Subsection C of this Section.
(7) Cybersecurity practices to secure unreleased model weights from
unauthorized modification or transfer, including measures to prevent
state-sponsored or other sophisticated threat actors from accessing model
capabilities.
(8) Identifying and responding to critical safety incidents, with specific
protocols for incidents involving cyberattacks on critical infrastructure or
potential biochemical threats.
(9) Instituting internal governance practices to ensure implementation
of these processes.
(10) Assessing and managing catastrophic risk resulting from the
internal use of its frontier models, including risks resulting from a frontier
model circumventing oversight mechanisms.
B.(1) A large frontier developer shall review and update its frontier AI
framework at least once per year.
(2) Within thirty days of making any material modification to its frontier
AI framework, a large frontier developer shall clearly and conspicuously
Page 6 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-731 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 474
publish on its website the modified frontier AI framework and a justification for
the modification.
C.(1) Before, or concurrently with, deploying a new or substantially
modified frontier model, a frontier developer shall clearly and conspicuously
publish on its website a transparency report containing the frontier model's
release date, languages, output modalities, intended uses, and restrictions or
conditions, and a mechanism to communicate with the frontier developer.
(2) Before, or concurrently with, deploying a new or substantially
modified frontier model, a large frontier developer shall include in the
transparency report required by Paragraph (1) of this Subsection summaries
of all of the following:
(a) Assessments of catastrophic risks from the frontier model conducted
pursuant to the frontier AI framework, including specific assessments of
cybersecurity capabilities and biochemical risk.
(b) The results of those assessments.
(c) The extent to which third-party evaluators, including cybersecurity
and biosecurity experts, were involved.
(d) Other steps taken to fulfill the requirements of the frontier AI
framework with respect to the frontier model.
(3) A frontier developer that publishes the information under this
Subsection in a larger document, including a system card or model card, shall
be in compliance with the applicable provision of this Section.
D. A large frontier developer shall transmit to the department a
summary of any assessment of catastrophic risk resulting from internal use of
its frontier models every three months or pursuant to another reasonable
schedule specified by the large frontier developer and communicated in writing
to the department.
E. A frontier developer shall not make a materially false or misleading
statement about catastrophic risk, its management of catastrophic risk, or its
Page 7 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-731 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 474
implementation of, or compliance with, its frontier AI framework, including but
not limited to in a certification filed to the department pursuant to Subsection
G of this Section, unless the statement was made in good faith and was
reasonable under the circumstances.
F.(1) Beginning on July 1, 2028, and at least annually thereafter, a large
frontier developer shall retain a third-party auditor to produce a report signed
and certified by the auditor that contains but is not limited to both of the
following:
(a) A detailed assessment of whether the large frontier developer has
substantially complied with its frontier AI framework during the prior year,
including cybersecurity and biochemical risk management provisions.
(b) Any material deviations between the requirements of the large
frontier developer's frontier AI framework and the large frontier developer's
actual practices during the prior year.
(2) The third-party auditor shall not conduct an audit if it has a financial
interest in the large frontier developer other than financial compensation for
performing an audit.
(3) Within thirty days of receiving an auditor's report required by
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the large frontier developer shall publish on
its website a high-level summary of the findings of the audit.
G. Within twelve months after publishing its frontier AI framework in
accordance with Subsection A of this Section, and annually thereafter, a large
frontier developer shall provide to the department a written certification
disclosing either of the following:
(1) That the developer has been in compliance with its frontier AI
framework during the prior year.
(2) Any material deviations from the developer's frontier AI framework
that occurred during the prior year, including a description of corrective
actions taken or planned.
Page 8 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-731 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 474
H.(1) When a frontier developer publishes documents to comply with the
provisions of this Section, the frontier developer may make redactions to those
documents as necessary to protect the frontier developer's trade secrets or
cybersecurity, public safety, or United States national security or to comply
with any federal or state law.
(2) If a frontier developer redacts information in a document pursuant
to this Subsection, the frontier developer shall describe the character and
justification of the redaction in any published version of the document to the
extent permitted by the concerns that justify redaction and shall retain the
unredacted information for five years.
§3111.4. Critical safety incident reporting
A. The department shall establish a mechanism for frontier developers
or the public to report critical safety incidents that includes all of the following
information:
(1) The date of the critical safety incident.
(2) The reasons the incident qualifies as a critical safety incident.
(3) A description of the incident, including whether the incident involved
cybersecurity threats to critical infrastructure or biochemical risks.
(4) Whether the incident involved internal use of a frontier model.
(5) Whether the incident posed any risk to energy, health care, or port
infrastructure in the state or in any other jurisdiction.
B.(1) The department shall establish a mechanism for large frontier
developers to confidentially submit summaries of any assessments of potential
catastrophic risk from internal use of its frontier models.
(2) The department shall take all precautions to limit access of any
summaries submitted pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection to only
personnel with a need to know and in order to prevent unauthorized access.
C.(1) Subject to the provisions of Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, a
frontier developer shall report any critical safety incident pertaining to its
Page 9 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-731 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 474
frontier models to the department within fifteen days after discovering the
critical safety incident.
(2) If a frontier developer discovers that a critical safety incident poses
an imminent risk of death, serious physical injury, or an active cyberattack on
critical infrastructure, the frontier developer shall disclose that incident within
twenty-four hours to the department and to any other appropriate authority
with jurisdiction as required by law.
(3) A frontier developer may file an amended report upon discovering
additional information about the critical safety incident.
D. The department shall review critical safety incident reports submitted
by frontier developers and may review reports submitted by the public.
E.(1) The department may transmit reports of critical safety incidents
and reports from covered employees to the legislature, the governor, the federal
government, or appropriate state or federal agencies, including the
Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency and the United States
Department of Homeland Security.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2028, and annually thereafter the department shall:
(a) Produce a report with anonymized and aggregated information about
critical safety incidents reviewed since the preceding report, with specific
sections addressing incidents related to cybersecurity and biochemical risks.
(b) Produce a report with anonymized and aggregated information about
covered employees' reports reviewed since the preceding report.
(3) A report transmitted pursuant to this Subsection shall not include
information that may compromise the frontier developer's trade secrets or
cybersecurity, public safety, or national security, or violate any federal or state
law.
(4) The department shall submit the reports to the president of the
Senate, the speaker of the House of Representatives, and the governor.
F.(1) The department may designate federal laws, regulations, or
Page 10 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-731 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 474
guidance that impose substantially equivalent or stricter standards or
requirements for critical safety incident reporting.
(2) After a frontier developer has declared to the department its intent
to comply with a designated federal law, regulation, or guidance, the frontier
developer shall constitute compliance with this Section to the extent that the
frontier developer complies with the designated federal law, regulation, or
guidance until the frontier developer revokes its intent or the department
revokes the relevant designation.
(3) Failure to meet these standards or requirements constitutes a
violation of this Part.
(4) The department shall revoke a designation if the requirements of
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection are no longer met.
§3111.5. Public records; exemption
A. The following records are confidential and shall not be subject to the
provisions of the Public Records Law, R.S. 44:1 et seq.:
(1) A report of assessments of catastrophic risk from internal use
pursuant to R.S. 51:3111.2.
(2) A certification submitted pursuant to R.S. 51:3111.2.
(3) A report of a critical safety incident submitted pursuant to R.S.
51:3111.3.
(4) A covered employee report.
B. The provisions of this Section shall terminate on July 1, 2031.
§3111.6. Annual assessment and recommendations
A. On or before July 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the department,
in consultation with the Governor's Office of Homeland Security and
Emergency Preparedness, shall assess developments relevant to this Chapter
and recommend whether to update the definitions of "frontier model",
"frontier developer", and "large frontier developer" to reflect technological
developments and widely accepted standards.
Page 11 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-731 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 474
B. In making recommendations pursuant to this Section, the department
shall consider:
(1) Similar federal or international thresholds for the management of
catastrophic risk, aligning with federal definitions to the extent consistent with
this Chapter.
(2) Evolving cybersecurity threat landscapes affecting critical
infrastructure, particularly energy, health care, and port sectors.
(3) Developments in biochemical weapon capabilities enabled or
facilitated by artificial intelligence.
(4) Stakeholder input, including input from critical infrastructure
operators in this state.
(5) The length, complexity, and external verifiability of coverage
determinations.
C. The department shall submit its findings and recommendations,
together with specific proposals for legislation, to the president of the Senate of
the Louisiana Legislature and the speaker of the House of Representatives of
the Louisiana Legislature.
§3111.7. Penalties
A. A large frontier developer that fails to publish or transmit a
compliant document required to be published or transmitted under this
Chapter, makes a statement in violation of R.S. 51:3111.2(E), fails to complete
a third-party audit or publish a summary of the results of an audit as required
by R.S. 51:3111.2(F), fails to complete a certification as required by R.S.
51:3111.2(G), fails to report an incident as required by R.S. 51:3111.3, or fails
to comply with its own frontier AI framework, is subject to a civil penalty.
B. The attorney general may bring an action against a violator to recover
a penalty not to exceed one million dollars per violation for a first violation or
ten million dollars for a second or subsequent violation of the same
requirement.
Page 12 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-731 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 474
C. For purposes of bringing an action pursuant to this Section, a frontier
developer or large frontier developer that develops, deploys, or operates
frontier models in this state is both engaged in substantial and not isolated
activities within this state, and is doing business in this state, shall be subject to
the jurisdiction of the courts of this state.
D. Loss of value of equity does not count as damage to or loss of property
for the purposes of this Chapter.
§3111.8. Preemption
This Chapter preempts any rule, regulation, code, ordinance, or other
law adopted by a parish, municipality, or other local governmental entity on or
after July 1, 2027, specifically related to the regulation of frontier developers
with respect to their management of catastrophic risk.
§3111.9. Whistleblower protections; frontier artificial intelligence developers
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the meanings
ascribed to them herein:
(1) "Catastrophic risk" has the same meaning as provided in R.S.
51:3111.2, except that the term applies to a foundation model.
(2) "Covered employee" means an employee responsible for assessing,
managing, or addressing risk of critical safety incidents.
(3) "Critical safety incident" has the same meaning as provided in R.S.
51:3112, except that the term applies to a foundation model.
B. Prohibited actions. A frontier developer shall not adopt, enforce, or
enter into any policy or contract that prevents a covered employee from, or
retaliates against a covered employee for, making a protected disclosure
pursuant to this Section, or disclosing information to the attorney general, a
federal authority, a supervisor, or another covered employee who has authority
to investigate, discover, or correct the reported issue, if the covered employee
has reasonable cause to believe that the information discloses that the frontier
developer's activities pose a specific and substantial danger to the public's
Page 13 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-731 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 474
health or safety resulting in a catastrophic risk, including risks to critical
infrastructure, or that the frontier developer has violated R.S. 51:3111.2 or R.S.
51:3111.3.
C. A frontier developer shall provide, to all covered employees, a clear
notice of their rights pursuant to this Section by as follows:
(1) Posting and displaying, at all times, within any workplace maintained
by the frontier developer, a notice of rights to all covered employees', to ensure
that any new or remote covered employee receives equivalent notice.
(2) Providing annual, written notice to each covered employee of their
rights under this Section, to be acknowledged by each covered employee.
D. Reporting process.
(1) A large frontier developer shall provide an anonymous, internal
process for covered employees to disclose, in good faith, information to the large
frontier developer which indicates specific and substantial danger to the
public's health or safety resulting in a catastrophic risk or a violation of R.S.
51:3111.2 or R.S. 51:3111.3. The process shall include a monthly update, to the
covered employee, regarding the status of the large frontier developer's
investigation of the disclosure and the actions being taken by the large frontier
developer in response to the disclosure.
(2) The disclosures and responses of the process pursuant to this
Subsection shall be shared with the officers and directors of the large frontier
developer on a quarterly basis, unless the officer or director is the subject of the
disclosure.
E. In a civil action pursuant to this Section, once it has been
demonstrated by a preponderance of the evidence that a proscribed activity
contributed to the alleged prohibited action by the covered employee, the
frontier developer shall prove, by clear and convincing evidence, that the action
occurred for legitimate, independent reasons.
F. A covered employee aggrieved by a violation of this Section may bring
Page 14 of 17
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-731 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 474
a civil action to a court of competent jurisdiction for appropriate temporary,
preliminary, or permanent injunctive relief. The court shall consider harm from
the violation and any chilling effect on other covered employees. The court may
award reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing plaintiff.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.